District of Columbia statutes.
26-1014

Maintenance of records.

(a)

Each licensee, shall make, keep and preserve the following books, accounts and other records for a period of 3 years:

(1)

A record of each payment instrument sold;

(2)

A general ledger containing all assets, liability, capital, income and expense accounts, which general ledger shall be posted at least monthly;

(3)

Settlement sheets received from authorized delegates;

(4)

Bank statements and bank reconciliation records;

(5)

Records of outstanding payment instruments;

(6)

Records of each payment instrument paid within the 3 year period;

(7)

A list of the names and addresses of all of the licensee’s authorized delegates; and

(8)

Records it is required to maintain pursuant to 31 C.F.R. Part 103.

(b)

Maintenance of such documents as are required by this section in a photographic, electronic, or other similar form shall constitute compliance with this section.

(c)

Records may be maintained at a location other than within the District of Columbia so long as they are made accessible to the Superintendent [Commissioner] within 7 days of written notice by the Superintendent [Commissioner].

History

July 18, 2000, D.C. Law 13-140, § 15, 47 DCR 3431